Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-919.01
Negotiated Rulemaking Act; use by agency.

Prior to the formal rulemaking procedure of section 84-907, agencies may use the procedures of the Negotiated Rulemaking Act to permit the direct participation of affected persons in the development of proposed rules and regulations. Negotiated rulemaking may be used to resolve controversial issues prior to the formal rulemaking of the Administrative Procedure Act. To be effective, such proposed rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act in the form proposed by the negotiated rulemaking committee or as amended by the agency.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 37.

Negotiated Rulemaking Act, see section 84-921.